District of Columbia statutes.
2-359.04

Sovereign immunity defense not available.

Unless otherwise specifically provided by law of the District, the District government and every officer, department, agency, or other unit of the District government shall not raise the defense of sovereign immunity in the courts of the District in an action based upon a written procurement contract executed on behalf of the District government.

History

Apr. 8, 2011, D.C. Law 18-371, § 904, 58 DCR 1185

Prior Codifications

2001 Ed., § 2-308.01.